South Dakota, session 2026, SB88.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 21-35-31 be AMENDED:
21-35-31. The provisions of this section only apply to a project that requires a
siting permit pursuant to chapter 49-41B. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
any person vested with authority to take private property for public use may cause an
examination and survey to be made as necessary for proposed facilities, and the person,
or the person's agent or officer, may enter the property to conduct the examination and
survey.
If the owner of the property denies permission for the examination or survey, the
person may conduct only an examination and must:
(1) Have a pending or approved siting permit application with the Public Utilities
Commission of the State of South Dakota pursuant to § 49-41B-11;
(2) Provide to the owner thirty days' written notice, served in accordance with § 15-6-
4 or sent by certified mail with return receipt requested, which contains:
(a) A description of the specific portions of property to be examined;
(b) The anticipated date and time of entry;
(c) The anticipated duration of presence on the property;
(d) A description of the type of examination that may be conducted; and
(e) The name and contact information of the person, or the person's agent or
officer, who will enter the property to conduct the examination; and
(3) Make a payment to the owner, or provide sufficient security for the payment, for
any actual damage done to the property by the entry.

26.440.16 2 88
The owner may challenge the proposed examination or survey by commencing an
action in circuit court in the county where the examination or survey is proposed, within
thirty days of service of the written notice.
Upon written request, the owner is entitled to a copy of the results of any survey
or examination conducted pursuant to this section.
This section does not apply to the state or its political subdivisions. This section is
in addition to and not in derogation of other existing law.
For purposes of this section, "examination" means a minimally invasive, superficial
inspection of real property, resulting in no more than minor soil disturbances, to obtain
general information that is not a matter of public record. For purposes of this section,
"survey" means a more detailed, comprehensive, or invasive investigation of real
property.
SB88 ENROLLED

26.440.16 3 88
An Act to clarify the procedure for a potential condemnor to examine real property absent the
property owner's permission.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 88
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 88 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB88 ENROLLED